Ohio, session 136, HB62.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3365.05 and 3365.07 be amended 4
and section 3365.072 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as 5
follows: 6
Sec. 3365.05. Each public and participating private 7
college shall do all of the following with respect to the 8
college credit plus program: 9
(A) Apply established standards and procedures for 10
admission to the college and for course placement for 11
participants. When determining admission and course placement, 12
the college shall do all of the following: 13
(1) Consider all available student data that may be an 14
indicator of college readiness, including grade point average 15
and end-of-course examination scores, if applicable; 16

H. B. No. 62 Page 2
As Introduced
(2) Give priority to its current students regarding 17
enrollment in courses. However, once a participant has been 18
accepted into a course, the college shall not displace the 19
participant for another student. 20
(3) Adhere to any capacity limitations that the college 21
has established for specified courses. 22
(B) Send written notice to the participant, the 23
participant's parent, and the participant's secondary school, 24
not later than fourteen calendar days prior to the first day of 25
classes for that term, of the participant's admission to the 26
college and to specified courses under the program. 27
(C) Provide both of the following, not later than twenty- 28
one calendar days after the first day of classes for that term, 29
to each participant and the participant's secondary school: 30
(1) The courses and hours of enrollment of the 31
participant; 32
(2) The option elected by the participant under division 33
(A) or (B) of section 3365.06 of the Revised Code for each 34
course. 35
The college shall also provide to each partnering school a 36
roster of participants from that school that are enrolled in the 37
college and a list of course assignments for each participant. 38
(D) Promote the program on the college's web site, 39
including the details of the college's current agreements with 40
partnering secondary schools. 41
(E) Coordinate with each partnering secondary school that 42
is located within thirty miles of the college to present at 43
least one informational session per school year for interested 44

H. B. No. 62 Page 3
As Introduced
students and parents. The session shall include the benefits and 45
consequences of participation and shall outline any changes or 46
additions to the requirements of the program. If there are no 47
partnering schools located within thirty miles of the college, 48
the college shall coordinate with the closest partnering school 49
to offer an informational session. 50
(F) Assign an academic advisor that is employed by the 51
college to each participant enrolled in that college. Prior to 52
the date on which a withdrawal from a course would negatively 53
affect a participant's transcripted grade, as prescribed by the 54
college's established withdrawal policy, the college shall 55
ensure that the academic advisor and the participant meet at 56
least once to discuss the program and the courses in which the 57
participant is enrolled. 58
(G) Do both of the following with regard to high school 59
teachers that are teaching courses for the college at a 60
secondary school under the program: 61
(1) Provide at least one professional development session 62
per school year; 63
(2) Conduct at least one classroom observation per school 64
year for each course that is authorized by the college and 65
taught by a high school teacher to ensure that the course meets 66
the quality of a college-level course. 67
(H) Annually collect, report, and track specified data 68
related to the program according to data reporting guidelines 69
adopted by the chancellor of higher education and the department 70
of education and workforce pursuant to section 3365.15 of the 71
Revised Code. 72
(I) Require each participant to complete an orientation 73

H. B. No. 62 Page 4
As Introduced
that meets guidelines issued by the chancellor and the 74
department. The chancellor and the department shall make those 75
guidelines as concise as is practicable. 76
(J) Provide notice to the secondary school of a 77
participant who withdraws from a course. 78
(K) With the exception of divisions (D) and (E) of this 79
section, any eligible out-of-state college participating in the 80
college credit plus program shall be subject to the same 81
requirements as a participating private college under this 82
section. 83
Sec. 3365.07. The department of education and workforce 84
shall calculate and pay state funds to colleges for participants 85
in the college credit plus program under division (B) of section 86
3365.06 of the Revised Code pursuant to this section. For a 87
nonpublic secondary school participant, a nonchartered nonpublic 88
secondary school participant, or a home-educated participant, 89
the department shall pay state funds pursuant to this section 90
only if that participant is awarded funding according to rules 91
adopted by the chancellor of higher education, in consultation 92
with the department of education and workforce, pursuant to 93
section 3365.071 of the Revised Code. The program shall be the 94
sole mechanism by which state funds are paid to colleges for 95
students to earn transcripted credit for college courses while 96
enrolled in both a secondary school and a college, with the 97
exception of state funds paid to colleges according to an 98
agreement described in division (A)(1) of section 3365.02 of the 99
Revised Code. 100
(A) For each public or nonpublic secondary school 101
participant enrolled in a public college: 102

H. B. No. 62 Page 5
As Introduced
(1) If no agreement has been entered into under division 103
(A)(2) of this section, both of the following shall apply: 104
(a) The department shall pay to the college the applicable 105
amount as follows: 106
(i) For a participant enrolled in a college course 107
delivered on the college campus, or at another location operated 108
by the college, or online, the lesser of the default ceiling 109
amount or the college's standard rate; . However, if that 110
college course is also offered at the participant's secondary 111
school and taught by a high school teacher who has met the 112
credential requirements established for purposes of the program 113
in rules adopted by the chancellor, the department instead shall 114
pay the college the default floor amount. 115
(ii) For a participant enrolled in a college course 116
delivered online or at the participant's secondary school but 117
taught by college faculty, the lesser of fifty per cent of the 118
default ceiling amount or the college's standard rate; 119
(iii) For a participant enrolled in a college course 120
delivered at the participant's secondary school and taught by a 121
high school teacher who has met the credential requirements 122
established for purposes of the program in rules adopted by the 123
chancellor, the default floor amount. 124
(b) The participant's secondary school shall pay for 125
textbooks, and the college shall waive payment of all other fees 126
related to participation in the program. 127
(2) The governing entity of a participant's secondary 128
school and the college may enter into an agreement to establish 129
an alternative payment structure for tuition, textbooks, and 130
fees. Under such an agreement, payments for each participant 131

H. B. No. 62 Page 6
As Introduced
made by the department shall be not less than the default floor 132
amount, unless approved by the chancellor, and not more than 133
either the default ceiling amount or the college's standard 134
rate, whichever is less. The chancellor may approve an agreement 135
that includes a payment below the default floor amount, as long 136
as the provisions of the agreement comply with all other 137
requirements of this chapter to ensure program quality. If no 138
agreement is entered into under division (A)(2) of this section, 139
both of the following shall apply: 140
(a) The department shall pay to the college the applicable 141
default amounts prescribed by division (A)(1)(a) of this 142
section, depending upon the method of delivery and instruction. 143
(b) In accordance with division (A)(1)(b) of this section, 144
the participant's secondary school shall pay for textbooks, and 145
the college shall waive payment of all other fees related to 146
participation in the program. 147
(3) No participant that is enrolled in a public college 148
shall be charged for any tuition, textbooks, or other fees 149
related to participation in the program. 150
(B) For each public secondary school participant enrolled 151
in a private college: 152
(1) If no agreement has been entered into under division 153
(B)(2) of this section, the department shall pay to the college 154
the applicable amount calculated in the same manner as in 155
division (A)(1)(a) of this section. 156
(2) The governing entity of a participant's secondary 157
school and the college may enter into an agreement to establish 158
an alternative payment structure for tuition, textbooks, and 159
fees. Under such an agreement, payments shall be not less than 160

H. B. No. 62 Page 7
As Introduced
the default floor amount, unless approved by the chancellor, and 161
not more than either the default ceiling amount or the college's 162
standard rate, whichever is less. 163
If an agreement is entered into under division (B)(2) of 164
this section, both of the following shall apply: 165
(a) The department shall make a payment to the college for 166
each participant that is equal to the default floor amount, 167
unless approved by the chancellor to pay an amount below the 168
default floor amount. The chancellor may approve an agreement 169
that includes a payment below the default floor amount, as long 170
as the provisions of the agreement comply with all other 171
requirements of this chapter to ensure program quality. 172
(b) Payment for costs for the participant that exceed the 173
amount paid by the department pursuant to division (B)(2)(a) of 174
this section shall be negotiated by the school and the college. 175
The agreement may include a stipulation permitting the charging 176
of a participant. 177
However, under no circumstances shall: 178
(i) Payments for a participant made by the department 179
under division (B)(2) of this section exceed the lesser of the 180
default ceiling amount or the college's standard rate; 181
(ii) The amount charged to a participant under division 182
(B)(2) of this section exceed the difference between the maximum 183
per participant charge amount and the default floor amount; 184
(iii) The sum of the payments made by the department for a 185
participant and the amount charged to that participant under 186
division (B)(2) of this section exceed the following amounts, as 187
applicable: 188

H. B. No. 62 Page 8
As Introduced
(I) For a participant enrolled in a college course 189
delivered on the college campus, or at another location operated 190
by the college, or online, the maximum per participant charge 191
amount; 192
(II) For a participant enrolled in a college course 193
delivered online or at the participant's secondary school but 194
taught by college faculty, one hundred twenty-five dollars; 195
(III) For a participant enrolled in a college course 196
delivered at the participant's secondary school and taught by a 197
high school teacher who has met the credential requirements 198
established for purposes of the program in rules adopted by the 199
chancellor, one hundred dollars. 200
(iv) A participant that is identified as economically 201
disadvantaged according to rules adopted by the department be 202
charged under division (B)(2) of this section for any tuition, 203
textbooks, or other fees related to participation in the program 204
or charged under section 3365.072 of the Revised Code for 205
textbooks. 206
(C) For each nonpublic secondary school participant 207
enrolled in a private or eligible out-of-state college, the 208
department shall pay to the college the applicable amount 209
calculated in the same manner as in division (A)(1)(a) of this 210
section. Payment for costs for the participant that exceed the 211
amount paid by the department shall be negotiated by the 212
governing body of the nonpublic secondary school and the 213
college. 214
However, under no circumstances shall: 215
(1) The payments for a participant made by the department 216
under this division exceed the lesser of the default ceiling 217

H. B. No. 62 Page 9
As Introduced
amount or the college's standard rate. 218
(2) Any nonpublic secondary school participant, who is 219
enrolled in that secondary school with a scholarship awarded 220
under either the educational choice scholarship pilot program, 221
as prescribed by sections 3310.01 to 3310.17, or the pilot 222
project scholarship program, as prescribed by sections 3313.974 223
to 3313.979 of the Revised Code, and who qualifies as a low- 224
income student, as determined by a method established by the 225
department be charged for any tuition, textbooks, or other fees 226
related to participation in the college credit plus program. 227
(D) For each nonchartered nonpublic secondary school 228
participant and each home-educated participant enrolled in a 229
public, private, or eligible out-of-state college, the 230
department shall pay to the college the lesser of the default 231
ceiling amount or the college's standard rate, if that 232
participant is enrolled in a college course delivered on the 233
college campus, at another location operated by the college, or 234
online. 235
(E) Not later than thirty days after the end of each term, 236
each college expecting to receive payment for the costs of a 237
participant under this section shall notify the department of 238
the number of enrolled credit hours for each participant. 239
(F) The department shall make the applicable payments 240
under this section to each college, which provided proper 241
notification to the department under division (E) of this 242
section, for the number of enrolled credit hours for 243
participants enrolled in the college under division (B) of 244
section 3365.06 of the Revised Code. Except in cases involving 245
incomplete participant information or a dispute of participant 246
information, payments shall be made by the last day of January 247

H. B. No. 62 Page 10
As Introduced
for participants who were enrolled during the fall term and by 248
the last day of July for participants who were enrolled during 249
the spring term. The department shall not make any payments to a 250
college under this section if a participant withdrew from a 251
course prior to the date on which a withdrawal from the course 252
would have negatively affected the participant's transcripted 253
grade, as prescribed by the college's established withdrawal 254
policy. 255
(1) Payments made for public secondary school participants 256
under this section shall be deducted as follows: 257
(a) For a participant enrolled in a school district, from 258
the school foundation payments made to the participant's school 259
district. If the participant is enrolled in a joint vocational 260
school district, a portion of the amount shall be deducted from 261
the payments to the joint vocational school district and a 262
portion shall be deducted from the payments to the participant's 263
city, local, or exempted village school district in accordance 264
with the full-time equivalency of the student's enrollment in 265
each district. 266
(b) For a participant enrolled in a community school 267
established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, from the 268
payments made to that school under section 3317.022 of the 269
Revised Code; 270
(c) For a participant enrolled in a STEM school, from the 271
payments made to that school under section 3317.022 of the 272
Revised Code; 273
(d) For a participant enrolled in a college-preparatory 274
boarding school, from the payments made to that school under 275
section 3328.34 of the Revised Code; 276

H. B. No. 62 Page 11
As Introduced
(e) For a participant enrolled in the state school for the 277
deaf or the state school for the blind, from the amount paid to 278
that school with funds appropriated by the general assembly for 279
support of Ohio deaf and blind education services; 280
(f) For a participant enrolled in an institution operated 281
by the department of youth services, from the amount paid to 282
that institution with funds appropriated by the general assembly 283
for support of that institution. 284
Amounts deducted under divisions (F)(1)(a) to (f) of this 285
section shall be calculated in accordance with rules adopted by 286
the chancellor, in consultation with the department of education 287
and workforce, pursuant to division (B) of section 3365.071 of 288
the Revised Code 289
(2) Payments made for nonpublic secondary school 290
participants, nonchartered nonpublic secondary school 291
participants, and home-educated participants under this section 292
shall be deducted from moneys appropriated by the general 293
assembly for such purpose. Payments shall be allocated and 294
distributed in accordance with rules adopted by the chancellor, 295
in consultation with the department of education and workforce, 296
pursuant to division (A) of section 3365.071 of the Revised 297
Code. 298
(G) Any public college that enrolls a student under 299
division (B) of section 3365.06 of the Revised Code may include 300
that student in the calculation used to determine its state 301
share of instruction funds appropriated to the department of 302
higher education by the general assembly. 303
Sec. 3365.072. This section applies only to participants 304
who elect to participate under division (B) of section 3365.06 305

H. B. No. 62 Page 12
As Introduced
of the Revised Code. 306
(A) As used in this section: 307
(1) "Open source materials" means free and publicly 308
available educational materials. "Open source materials" 309
includes a free and publicly available textbook. 310
(2) "Program course" means a course in which a participant 311
is enrolled. 312
(3) "Purchase-only textbook" means a textbook that is not 313
free and publicly available and that must be purchased. 314
(B) Each public and participating private college shall 315
endeavor to use open source materials, in lieu of purchase-only 316
textbooks, in a program course. 317
(C) In the case of a public or participating private 318
college using a purchase-only textbook in a program course when 319
there are open source materials that may be used in lieu of that 320
textbook, the college shall pay for the participant's textbook. 321
(D) In the case of a public or participating private 322
college using a purchase-only textbook in a program course 323
because there are no open source materials that may be used in 324
lieu of that textbook, the college shall pay fifty per cent of 325
the textbook's cost and the participant's secondary school shall 326
pay fifty per cent of the textbook's cost. 327
(E) Any eligible out-of-state college participating in the 328
college credit plus program is subject to this section in the 329
same manner as a participating private college. 330
Section 2. That existing sections 3365.05 and 3365.07 of 331
the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 332